Washington statutes.
RCW 28B.30.140

Regents—Employees, board members, to have no interest in contracts.

No employee or member of the university board of regents shall be interested pecuniarily, either directly or indirectly, in any contract for any building or improvement at said university, or for the furnishing of supplies for the same.

[ 1969 ex.s. c 223 s 28B.30.140. Prior: 1909 c 97 p 249 s 17; RRS s 4597; prior: 1897 c 118 s 206; 1891 c 145 s 21. Formerly RCW 28.80.170.]

NOTES:

Code of ethics, interest in contract, public officers and employees: Chapters 42.23, 42.52 RCW.